Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201886-320.02
Prepaid wireless telecommunications service provider, defined.

Prepaid wireless telecommunications service provider means a wireless telecommunications company whose service must be paid for in advance and is sold in predetermined units or dollars of which the number declines with use in a known amount or expiration of time.

Laws 2018, LB157, § 3.
July 19, 2018